Massachusetts, session 194th, H869.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. RANKED CHOICE VOTING
(a) All offices elected at the annual town election or town special election shall be elected
by ranked choice voting, except for a single-seat office when the number of certified candidates
is less than or equal to 2 or a multi-seat office when the number of certified candidates is less
than or equal to the number of seats to be elected. Ranked choice voting elections shall be
tabulated in rounds pursuant to this section.
(b) In any single-seat election, each round shall begin by counting the number of votes
for each continuing candidate. Each ballot shall count as 1 vote for its highest-ranked continuing
of 3

candidate. Concluded ballots shall not be counted for any continuing candidate. Each round shall
end with 1 of the following 2 outcomes:
(1) If there are more than 2 continuing candidates, the last-place candidate shall be
defeated or the last-place candidates shall be defeated in batch elimination, and a new round shall
begin; or
(2) If there are 2 continuing candidates, the candidate with the fewest votes shall be
defeated, the candidate with the most votes shall be elected, and tabulation shall be complete.
(c) In any multi-seat election, each round shall begin by counting the number of votes for
each continuing candidate. Each ballot shall count, at its current transfer value, for its highest-
ranked continuing candidate. Concluded ballots shall not count for any continuing candidate. In
the first round only, the election threshold shall then be calculated. Each round shall end with 1
of the following 3 outcomes:
(1) If at least 1 continuing candidate has more votes than the election threshold, then all
such candidates shall be elected. Each ballot counting for an elected candidate shall be assigned a
new transfer value by multiplying the ballot’s current transfer value by the surplus fraction for
the candidate. Each elected candidate shall be deemed to have a number of votes equal to the
election threshold in all future rounds, and a new round shall begin;
(2) If no continuing candidate has more votes than the election threshold and the sum of
the number of elected candidates and continuing candidates is more than the sum of the number
of seats to be elected and 1, the last-place candidate shall be defeated or the last-place candidates
shall be defeated in batch elimination, and a new round shall begin; or
of 3

(3) Otherwise, the continuing candidate with fewest votes shall be defeated, all other
continuing candidates shall be elected, and tabulation is complete.
(d) Batch elimination shall apply to the largest possible group of continuing candidates
such that the sum of the votes of candidates in the group is less than the individual number of
votes of every continuing candidate not in the group, and provided that the number of continuing
candidates not in the group is at least 1 more than the remaining number of positions to elect.
(e) If 2 or more last-place candidates are tied and batch elimination does not apply, the
candidate with the fewest votes in the prior round shall be defeated. If 2 or more such tied
candidates were tied in the prior round, the second tie shall be decided by referring similarly to
the standing of the candidates, in terms of votes, in the second-prior round. This process shall be
applied successively as many times as necessary, a tie shown in any prior round shall be decided
by referring to the standing of the candidates in the round immediately preceding the tie.
(f) The Select Board, in consultation with the Town Clerk, may make any changes to the
ranked choice voting ballot and tabulation process necessary to ensure the integrity and smooth
functioning of the election, provided that ranked choice voting shall still be used and the fewest
number of changes are made to achieve such purpose.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage. The first election using Ranked
Choice Voting shall take place no sooner than 2025.
of 3